Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 58. Commission on Economic Opportunity for Virginians in Aspiring and Diverse Communities.

§§ 30-362 through 30-370.
[Expired.]

Editor’s note.

Former §§ 30-362 through 30-370, which established the Commission on Economic Opportunity for Virginians in Aspiring and Diverse Communities, were enacted by Acts 2016, c. 650; amended by Acts 2019, c. 525; and expired July 1, 2020, by the terms of § 30-370. Acts 2019, c. 525 amended § 30-370 to change the expiration date from July 1, 2019 to July 1, 2020.